District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.127

Limited binding and beneficial effect.

(a)

The Agreement shall bind and inure only to the benefit of the District of Columbia and the other member states. No person, other than a member state, is an intended beneficiary of the Agreement. Any benefit to a person other than a state shall be established by the law of the District of Columbia and the other member states and not by the terms of the Agreement.

(b)

Consistent with subsection (a) of this section, no person shall have any cause of action or defense under the Agreement or by virtue of the District of Columbia’s approval of the Agreement. No person may challenge, in any action brought under any provision of law, any action or inaction by any department, agency, or other instrumentality of the District of Columbia, or any political subdivision of the District of Columbia, on the ground that the action or inaction is inconsistent with the Agreement.

(c)

No law of the District of Columbia, or the application thereof, shall be declared invalid as to any person or circumstance on the ground that the provision or application is inconsistent with the Agreement.

History

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-156, § 8, 49 DCR 4272